Louisiana, session 2026, SB376.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:81(A)(8), 3996(B)(92), and Chapter 47 of Title 17 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 17:4201 through 4212, are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§81. General powers of local public school boards
A.(1) Each local public school board shall serve in a policymaking capacity
that is in the best interests of all students enrolled in schools under the board's
jurisdiction. When establishing board policies, each board shall prioritize student
achievement, financial efficiency, and workforce development on a local, regional,
and statewide basis. When choosing a local superintendent of schools, each board
shall select a leader who shall prioritize student achievement and act in the best
interests of all students enrolled in schools under the board's jurisdiction.
Page 1 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 376 ENROLLED
* * *
(8) Each local public school board shall have the authority to establish,
operate, or enter into agreements for the operation of career practicums
pursuant to R.S. 17:4201 et seq.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(92) Career practicums, R.S. 17:4201 et seq.
* * *
CHAPTER 47. CAREER PRACTICUMS
§4201. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Learn and Earn
Act".
§4202. Legislative findings and intent
A. The legislature finds that Louisiana's long-term workforce
competitiveness depends on the development of a coherent, statewide talent
development system.
B. Compensated, credit-bearing work-based learning aligned with the
State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education (BESE) approved career
pathways is a critical component of such a system.
C. Reliance solely on external employer work sites creates inequitable
access to work-based learning for rural students and students in underserved
Page 2 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 376 ENROLLED
communities.
D. Career practicums, as provided for in this Chapter, shall serve an
essential educational purpose by advancing established state objectives related
to career and technical education, financial literacy, employability skills, and
workforce development.
E.(1) A career practicum shall operate pursuant to a cooperative
endeavor agreement that complies with Article VII, Section 14 of the
Constitution of Louisiana and meets the requirements of the Cabela's test as
held in Board of Directors of Indus. Development Bd. of City of Gonzales,
Louisiana, Inc. v. All Tax Payers, Property Owners, Citizens of City of Gonzales,
et al., 938 So.2d 11 (La. 9/6/06).
(2) In order to satisfy the Cabela's test, a career practicum must serve a
valid public purpose; be an enforceable, nongratutious obligation; and there
must be a reasonable expectation of value equal to or greater than the value of
public assets provided.
(3) Compliance with the Cabela's test is mandatory and shall be
demonstrated through the cooperative endeavor agreement.
§4203. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Business partner" means a private business entity, financial
institution, or nonprofit organization that enters into a cooperative endeavor
agreement with a city, parish, or other local school board to operate a career
practicum.
(2) "Career practicum" means a limited scope educational franchise
operation conducted on a public high school campus pursuant to a cooperative
endeavor agreement, whose primary purpose is to deliver compensated, credit-
bearing work-based learning, aligned with BESE-approved career pathways,
and related instruction.
(3) "Fair market value" means the value of public assets, services, or
Page 3 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 376 ENROLLED
resources made available to a business partner, including space, utilities,
equipment, or other measurable benefits, calculated pursuant to BESE-
approved methodology using commercially reasonable valuation principles.
(4) "Instructional scope" means the defined operational boundaries of
a career practicum that are directly tied to instructional objectives, including
pathway aligned activities, financial literacy instruction, employability skill
development, and compensated work-based learning.
(5) "Student participant" means a student enrolled in a BESE-approved,
work-based learning course who participates in a career practicum and is
compensated as an employee of the business partner.
(6) "Hazardous occupation" shall mean any occupation or activity
prohibited for minors under the provisions of the Louisiana Works rules
governing the employment of minors.
§4204. Authorization; limited-scope model
A. A city, parish, or other local school board may establish and host one
or more career practicums on Louisiana public high school campuses in
accordance with this Chapter.
B. A career practicum shall operate exclusively within the instructional
scope defined in its cooperative endeavor agreement and shall not engage in
general commercial activity unrelated to instructional purposes.
C. Career practicums shall align with BESE-approved career pathways
and integrate financial literacy and employability skill development.
D. Any student participating in a career practicum under this Chapter
who performs a credit-bearing internship experience aligned to a BESE-
approved career pathway shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirements for
an internship for purposes of the state school and district accountability system,
as defined by rules of the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education.
E. A business partner shall provide reciprocity under the cooperative
endeavor agreement that meets or exceeds the fair market value of public assets
utilized and shall fulfill all educational obligations established in the agreement.
Page 4 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 376 ENROLLED
F. Career practicums may provide customer-facing services only to the
extent such services fall within the instructional scope established in the
cooperative endeavor agreement.
G. Career practicums operating solely within the instructional scope of
a compliant cooperative endeavor agreement shall be deemed instructional
functions of the city, parish, or other local school board and shall not be
classified as commercial tenants.
H. Any employee, agent, or representative of a business partner who has
direct and unsupervised interaction with students participating in a career
practicum shall be subject to the same criminal background check and
eligibility requirements applicable to school employees and instructors pursuant
to applicable state law and policy of the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education.
I. Where a career practicum includes limited customer-facing services
within the instructional scope, the city, parish, or other local school board shall
retain full authority to regulate campus access consistent with existing safety
and visitor policies. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to require
general public access to school campuses.
§4205. Cooperative endeavor agreements
A. Each career practicum shall operate pursuant to a written cooperative
endeavor agreement between the city, parish, or other local school board and
the business partner.
B. The agreement shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) A declaration of the essential educational and public purpose served.
(2) Enforceable, nongratuitous obligations of the business partner.
(3) An inventory and valuation of public assets utilized, including a fair
market value schedule.
(4) A reciprocity schedule demonstrating a reasonable expectation that
benefits provided by the business partner meet or exceed fair market value.
(5) Annual fair market value recertification.
Page 5 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 376 ENROLLED
(6) A clear statement of instructional scope and operating parameters.
(7) Liability insurance naming the city, parish, or other local school
board and the state as additional insureds.
(8) Indemnification of the city, parish, or other local school board and
the state.
(9) Safety, supervision, and training requirements.
(10) Compliance with applicable federal and state laws governing student
data privacy, child labor, workplace safety, and accessibility.
C. Each cooperative endeavor agreement shall be public record and
posted on the website of the city, parish, or other local school board.
D. Nothing in this Chapter shall limit the authority of a city, parish, or
other local school board to oversee, monitor, or evaluate the operations of a
career practicum.
§4206. Student labor, safety, and supervision
A. Student participants shall:
(1) Earn academic credit pursuant to BESE rules.
(2) Receive wages at or above the applicable minimum wage.
(3) Be employees of the business partner for wage and workers'
compensation purposes.
(4) Receive required safety training prior to participation.
(5) Be prohibited from engaging in hazardous occupations barred for
minors.
B. Career practicums shall be structured so that student participants are
the primary beneficiaries of the educational experience.
C. Career practicums shall comply with all applicable school safety,
supervision, and visitor access requirements.
§4207. Reciprocity and restricted use of funds
A. Business partners shall provide reciprocity as established in the
cooperative endeavor agreement, meeting or exceeding fair market value
requirements.
Page 6 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 376 ENROLLED
B. Any funds provided to a city, parish, or other local school board as
reciprocity or compensation shall be deposited into a restricted Career
Practicum Fund and used solely for work-based learning, instructional
equipment, or related educational purposes.
§4208. Rulemaking authority; limitations
The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this Chapter in
accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act. Such rules
shall implement but not waive, narrow, or redefine the statutory requirements
of instructional scope, fair market value valuation, reciprocity, or student
protections established in this Chapter.
§4209. Trade and commerce limitation
A career practicum operating solely within the instructional scope of a
compliant cooperative endeavor agreement shall not be deemed to be engaged
in trade or commerce for purposes of R.S. 51:1401 et seq.
§4210. Proprietary school exemption
A career practicum authorized under this Chapter shall be deemed an
extension of public educational programming and shall not be classified as a
proprietary school pursuant to R.S. 17:3140.1 et seq.
§4211. Charter school participation
A charter school governing authority may authorize a career practicum
on its campus in accordance with applicable charter law and the school's
charter contract. Where the career practicum involves the use of facilities or
property owned by a city, parish, or other local school board or other public
entity, any cooperative endeavor agreement required under this Chapter shall
be executed in a manner consistent with applicable law governing such
property.
§4212. Existing programs
A. On-campus business operations or work-based learning programs
lawfully operating on Louisiana public high school campuses prior to the
Page 7 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 376 ENROLLED
effective date of this Act may continue, provided they serve an educational
purpose and comply with Article VII, Section 14 of the Louisiana Constitution.
B. Beginning with the 2029-2030 school year, all programs subject to
Subsection A of this Section shall be in compliance with all other provisions of
this Chapter.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 8 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.